Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2716
Unclaimed funds; judge; payment to successor.

Upon the expiration of any judge's term of office, he shall pay to his successor in office, any fees, money, costs, legacies, devises or money due any heir, creditor, or other person, in his possession, which have not been paid to the persons entitled thereto, or applied as provided by law.

Laws 1909, c. 40, § 2, p. 227;

R.S.1913, § 1243;

Laws 1921, c. 105, § 1, p. 376;

C.S.1922, § 1166;

C.S.1929, § 27-546;

R.S.1943, § 24-552;

Laws 1967, c. 139, § 3, p. 426;

R.R.S.1943, § 24-552;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 62;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-562.